Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB682.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 75.031 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) 1. Upon creation of a fire protection district or a volunteer fire department
district as provided in KRS 75.010, the affairs of the district shall be
conducted by the board of trustees consisting of seven (7) members,
four (4) to be elected by the members of the district as hereinafter set out
and three (3) to be appointed by the county judge/executive or the
mayor in a consolidated local government pursuant to the provisions of
KRS 67C.139.
2. Two (2) members of the board of trustees shall be elected by the
members of the firefighters of the district and shall be full-time paid
employees of the district or members of the district who personally
reside in the district.
3. Two (2) members of the board of trustees shall be property owners who
own real or personal property which is subject to the fire protection tax
pursuant to KRS 75.040, who personally reside in the district, and who
are not active firefighters and shall be elected by the property owners of
the district. Property owners voting to select representatives to the board
of trustees shall have attained the age of eighteen (18).
4. The county judge/executive of the county in which the greater part of
the district is located shall, with the approval of the fiscal court, appoint
three (3) members of the board of trustees who personally reside in the
district. In counties containing a city of the first class, trustees appointed
by the county judge/executive to serve in volunteer fire prevention
districts shall reside within the boundaries of that county. In counties
Page 1 of 6
HB068210.100 - 2001 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:28 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 682/GA
governed by a consolidated local government, trustees appointed by the
mayor to serve in volunteer fire prevention districts shall reside within
the boundaries of the consolidated local government.
5. At the first election held after the district is formed, one (1) firefighter
shall be elected to serve on the board of trustees for a period of one (1)
year and one (1) for a period of three (3) years, and one (1)
nonfirefighter property owner shall be elected to serve on the board of
trustees for a period of two (2) years and one (1) for a period of four (4)
years. On the expiration of the respective terms, the successor to each
shall have the same qualifications as his or her predecessor and shall be
elected for a term of four (4) years. The original appointed members of
the board of trustees shall be appointed for terms of one (1), two (2), and
three (3) years respectively. On the expiration of the respective terms,
the successors to each shall be appointed for a term of three (3) years.
6. Upon the establishment of a consolidated local government, incumbent
members shall continue to serve until the expiration of their current term
of office.
7. In the event of a vacancy in the term of an appointed or elected trustee,
the county judge/executive shall appoint with the approval of the fiscal
court a trustee for the remainder of the term, except in a county
containing a consolidated local government. In a county containing a
consolidated local government, the mayor pursuant to the provisions of
KRS 67C.139 shall appoint a trustee for the remainder of the term.
(b) An appointed trustee may be removed from office as provided by KRS
65.007.
(c) 1. No person shall be an elected trustee who is not a resident of the
district, except as provided in subsection (1)(a)2. of this section, and
Page 2 of 6
HB068210.100 - 2001 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:28 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 682/GA
who, at the time of his or her election, is not a citizen of Kentucky and
has not attained the age of twenty-one (21).
2. Except for trustees elected under subsection (1)(a)2. of this section, a
vacancy shall be declared to exist if an elected trustee no longer
resides within the boundaries of the district at any time during his or
her term of office.
(d) Unless otherwise provided by law, an elected firefighter trustee may be
removed from office by the mayor of a consolidated local government, or in a
county not containing a consolidated local government, by the county
judge/executive of the county in which the greater part of the district is
located. An elected firefighter trustee may be removed after a hearing with
notice as required by KRS Chapter 424, for inefficiency, neglect of duty,
malfeasance, or conflict of interest. The hearing shall be initiated and chaired
by the county judge/executive of a county or the mayor of a consolidated local
government, who shall prepare a written statement setting forth the reasons
for removal. The trustee to be removed shall be notified of his or her proposed
removal and the reasons for the proposed removal by registered mail sent to
his or her last known address at least ten (10) days prior to the hearing. The
person proposed to be removed may employ counsel to represent him or her.
A record of the hearing shall be made by the county judge/executive or mayor
respectively.
(e) The removal of an elected firefighter trustee of a fire protection district shall
be subject to the approval of the fiscal court of the county in which the greater
part of the district is located in those counties not containing a consolidated
local government or the legislative council in a county containing a
consolidated local government.
(f) An elected firefighter trustee removed pursuant to paragraphs (d) and (e) of
Page 3 of 6
HB068210.100 - 2001 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:28 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 682/GA
this subsection may appeal, within ten (10) days of the rendering of the
decision of the fiscal court or legislative council, respectively, to the Circuit
Court of the county in which the greater part of the district is located. The
scope of the appeal shall be limited to whether the county judge/executive,
mayor, legislative council, or the fiscal court respectively, abused their
discretion in removing the trustee.
(2) The elective offices of members of the board of trustees shall be filled by an
election to be held once each year on the fourth Saturday of June between the hours
of 11:00 a.m. and 2:00 p.m. The polls shall be located at the principal fire house in
the district. The date, time, and place of the election shall be advertised in
accordance with KRS 424.120. This notice shall be advertised at least thirty (30)
days prior to the election date and shall include the names and addresses of the
candidates to be voted on for each position of trustee. In lieu of the published notice
for the election of the firefighter trustees, written notice containing the information
required to be advertised may be sent by first-class mail to each member of the
firefighters of the fire protection district or volunteer fire department district,
addressed to the firefighter at his or her residence, at least thirty (30) days prior to
the election date. The nominations for candidates for trustees both representing the
firefighters and the property owners residing in the district shall be made in
accordance with the bylaws of the department. The terms of the three (3) trustees
appointed by the county judge/executive or mayor shall start at the same time as the
terms of the elected trustees. On or before the beginning of the second fiscal or
calendar year, depending on which basis the fire protection or volunteer fire
department district is being operated, after June 16, 1966, all departments organized
prior to June 16, 1966, shall increase their boards of trustees from three (3) to seven
(7) members and elect the elective members in the manner set forth herein.
(3) The trustees shall elect from their number a chairman, a secretary, and a treasurer,
Page 4 of 6
HB068210.100 - 2001 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:28 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 682/GA
the latter of whom shall give bond in an amount as shall be determined by the
county judge/executive of the county in which the greater part of the fire protection
district is located or the mayor in a consolidated local government, conditioned
upon the faithful discharge of the duties of his or her office, and the faithful
accounting for all funds which may come into his or her possession as treasurer.
The premiums on the bonds shall be paid out of the funds of the district.
Section 2. KRS 273.207 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The affairs of a corporation shall be managed by a board of directors. Except as
provided in subsection (2) of this section, directors need not be residents of this
state or members of the corporation unless the articles of incorporation or the
bylaws so require. The articles of incorporation or the bylaws may prescribe other
qualifications for directors.
(2) The members of the board of directors of a fire department organized under this
chapter shall be residents of the geographic area served by the corporation. A
vacancy shall be declared to exist if a member no longer resides within the
geographic area served by the corporation at any time during his or her term of
office.
Section 3. On the effective date of this Act:
(1) A vacancy shall be declared to exist in the office of any board of trustee
member serving under Section 1 of this Act who does not qualify under subsection
(1)(a)2. of Section 1 of this Act, and the vacancy shall be filled in accordance with
Section 1 of this Act; and
(2) A vacancy shall be declared to exist in the office of any board of director
member serving under Section 2 of this Act who does not personally reside in the
geographic area served by the corporation, and the vacancy shall be filled in accordance
with KRS 273.213.
Section 4. Whereas it is critical to ensure the representation of residents served
Page 5 of 6
HB068210.100 - 2001 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:28 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 682/GA
by fire protection entities, an emergency is declared to exist, and this Act takes effect
upon its passage and approval by the Governor or upon its otherwise becoming a law.
Page 6 of 6
HB068210.100 - 2001 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:28 AM GA